Utah statutes.
13-5-10.   Cost -- Purchase price at forced sales.
In establishing the cost of a given article, product or commodity to the
distributor and vendor, the invoice cost of said article, product or commodity
purchased at a forced, bankrupt, closeout sale or other sale outside of the
ordinary channels of trade may not be used as a basis for justifying a price
lower than one based upon the replacement cost as of the date of said sale of
said article, product or commodity replaced through the ordinary channels of
trade, unless said articles, product or commodity is kept separate from goods
purchased in the ordinary channels of trade and unless said article, product
or commodity is advertised and sold as merchandise purchased at a forced,
bankrupt, closeout sale, or by means other than through the ordinary channels
of trade, and said advertising shall state the conditions under which said
goods were so purchased, and the quantity of such merchandise to be sold or
offered for sale.
